District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.19

Recomputation of annuities.

The annuities of all teachers retired prior to July 1, 1946, shall be recomputed in accordance with the provisions of § 38-2021.05 within 90 days after August 7, 1946, retroactive to July 1, 1946, and no recomputation shall be made which will reduce the annuity received by any retired teacher; provided, that the average annual salary during any 5 consecutive years, specified in § 38-2021.05, upon which the annuity is based shall be within the last 10 years of allowable service in the public schools of the District of Columbia; provided further, that the increased amount of the annuity resulting therefrom shall be a straight life annuity without any insurance or death benefits of any kind.

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 882, ch. 779, § 19
1981 Ed., § 31-1240.
1973 Ed., § 31-739.